Utah statutes.
53-5c-102.   Definitions.

(1)  "Cohabitant" means a person who is 21 years of age or older who resides in the same residence as the other party.

(2)  "Firearm" means a pistol, revolver, shotgun, short barrel shotgun, rifle or short barrel rifle, or a device that could be used as a dangerous weapon from which is expelled a projectile by action of an explosive.

(3)  "Illegal firearm" means a firearm the ownership or possession of which is prohibited under state or federal law.

(4)  "Law enforcement agency" means a municipal or county police agency or an officer of that agency.

(5)  "Owner cohabitant" means a cohabitant who owns, in whole or in part, a firearm.

(6)  "Public interest use" means:

(a)  use by a government agency as determined by the legislative body of the agency's jurisdiction; or

(b)  donation to a bona fide charity.



Enacted by Chapter 188, 2013 General Session

